Utah statutes.
4-7-2.   Purpose declaration.
The Legislature finds and declares that the public interest requires
regulation of the sale of products of agriculture between the producer and
persons who purchase such products for resale to protect producers from
unwarranted hazard and loss in the sale of their products and to ensure an
adequate and available supply of products to the ultimate consumer within the
state.
